New York, session 2025-2026, A4372.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "single 2 opportunity for legislative equality (SOLE) act". 3 § 2. The legislative law is amended by adding a new section 33-a to 4 read as follows: 5 § 33-a. Entitlement to one statewide bill during each two-year term. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, during each two- 7 year term of the legislature, each member shall be entitled to have at 8 least one statewide piece of legislation, of the member's choosing, 9 exclusive of any bill accompanied by a home rule message, discharged 10 from committee and brought to the floor for a vote. A member may bring 11 such bill to the floor for a vote by filing a written notice with the 12 clerk of senate desk operations or the index clerk of the assembly on a 13 form provided by such clerk. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07700-01-5